Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0186.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, 2026, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $17,769,551,300.00 $100.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of $78,830,600.00 $100.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed $41,000,000.00 $100.00 from the community district education trust fund created under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.262, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 $100.00 from the school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 $100.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 $100.00 from the school meals reserve fund created under section 30e, an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 $100.00 from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed $334,100,000.00 $100.00 from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund created under section 147b, and an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 $100.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund created in section 27d. In addition, all available federal funds are only appropriated as allocated in this article for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025.2026. (2) The appropriations under this section are allocated as provided in this article. Money appropriated under this section from the general fund must be expended to fund the purposes of this article before the expenditure of money appropriated under this section from the state school aid fund. (3) Any general fund allocations under this article that are not expended by the end of the fiscal year are transferred to the school aid stabilization fund created under section 11a. Sec. 17b. (1) Not later than October 20, November 20, December 20, January 20, February 20, March 20, April 20, May 20, June 20, July 20, and August 20, the department shall prepare electronic files of the amount to be distributed under this act in the installment to the districts and intermediate districts and deliver the electronic files to the state treasurer, and the state treasurer shall pay the installments on each of those dates or, if the date is not a business day, on the next business day following that date. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the portion of the district's or intermediate district's state fiscal year entitlement to be included in each installment shall must be 1/11. A district or intermediate district shall accrue the payments received in July and August to the school fiscal year ending the immediately preceding June 30. (2) The state treasurer shall make payment under this section by drawing a warrant in favor of the treasurer of each district or intermediate district for the amount payable to the district or intermediate district according to the electronic files and delivering the warrant to the treasurer of each district or intermediate district, or if the state treasurer receives a written request by the treasurer of the district or intermediate district specifying an account, by electronic funds transfer to that account of the amount payable to the district or intermediate district according to the electronic files. The department may make adjustments in payments made under this section through additional payments when changes in law or errors in computation cause the regularly scheduled payment to be less than the amount to which the district or intermediate district is entitled pursuant to under this act. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this act, grant payments to districts and intermediate districts under this act shall be paid according to the installment payment schedule under subsection (1). (4) Upon the written request of a district or intermediate district and the submission of proof satisfactory to the department of a need of a temporary and nonrecurring nature, the superintendent, with the written concurrence of the state treasurer and the state budget director, may authorize an advance release of funds due a district or intermediate district under this act. An advance authorized under this subsection shall must not cause funds to be paid to a district or intermediate district more than 30 days earlier than the established payment date for those funds. Sec. 201. (1) Subject to the conditions set forth in this article, the amounts listed in this section are appropriated for community colleges for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, 2026, from the funds indicated in this section. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this section and section 201f: (a) The gross appropriation is $462,220,800.00. $100.00. After deducting total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers in the amount of $0.00, the adjusted gross appropriation is $462,220,800.00.$100.00. (b) The sources of the adjusted gross appropriation described in subdivision (a) are as follows: (i) Total federal revenues, $0.00. (ii) Total local revenues, $0.00. (iii) Total private revenues, $0.00. (iv) Total other state restricted revenues, $461,720,800.00.$100.00. (v) State general fund/general purpose money, $500,000.00.$100.00. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the amount appropriated for community college operations is $363,363,500.00, allocated as follows:$100.00. (a) The appropriation for Alpena Community College is $6,425,100.00, $6,300,600.00 for operations, $102,700.00 for performance funding, and $21,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (b) The appropriation for Bay de Noc Community College is $6,398,000.00, $6,185,300.00 for operations, $112,700.00 for performance funding, and $100,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (c) The appropriation for Delta College is $16,907,200.00, $16,642,300.00 for operations, $240,100.00 for performance funding, and $24,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (d) The appropriation for Glen Oaks Community College is $2,985,900.00, $2,939,000.00 for operations, $45,100.00 for performance funding, and $1,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (e) The appropriation for Gogebic Community College is $5,447,400.00, $5,329,700.00 for operations, $69,300.00 for performance funding, and $48,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (f) The appropriation for Grand Rapids Community College is $21,295,300.00, $20,844,400.00 for operations, $339,800.00 for performance funding, and $111,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (g) The appropriation for Henry Ford College is $25,307,100.00, $24,929,800.00 for operations, $370,900.00 for performance funding, and $6,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (h) The appropriation for Jackson College is $14,074,900.00, $13,854,100.00 for operations, $178,500.00 for performance funding, and $42,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (i) The appropriation for Kalamazoo Valley Community College is $14,741,600.00, $14,481,900.00 for operations, $222,500.00 for performance funding, and $37,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (j) The appropriation for Kellogg Community College is $11,462,100.00, $11,269,200.00 for operations, $157,500.00 for performance funding, and $35,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (k) The appropriation for Kirtland Community College is $3,860,900.00, $3,773,100.00 for operations, $62,000.00 for performance funding, and $25,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (l) The appropriation for Lake Michigan College is $6,414,200.00, $6,318,000.00 for operations, $90,200.00 for performance funding, and $6,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (m) The appropriation for Lansing Community College is $36,215,600.00, $35,689,200.00 for operations, $445,200.00 for performance funding, and $81,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (n) The appropriation for Macomb Community College is $38,184,300.00, $37,635,400.00 for operations, $525,200.00 for performance funding, and $23,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (o) The appropriation for Mid Michigan Community College is $5,912,500.00, $5,742,900.00 for operations, $94,100.00 for performance funding, and $75,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (p) The appropriation for Monroe County Community College is $5,370,300.00, $5,284,700.00 for operations, $83,800.00 for performance funding, and $1,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (q) The appropriation for Montcalm Community College is $4,035,200.00, $3,957,200.00 for operations, $76,100.00 for performance funding, and $1,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (r) The appropriation for C.S. Mott Community College is $18,023,600.00, $17,791,700.00 for operations, $226,100.00 for performance funding, and $5,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (s) The appropriation for Muskegon Community College is $10,381,200.00, $10,210,900.00 for operations, $149,000.00 for performance funding, and $21,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (t) The appropriation for North Central Michigan College is $4,110,200.00, $3,868,800.00 for operations, $78,900.00 for performance funding, and $162,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (u) The appropriation for Northwestern Michigan College is $10,816,600.00, $10,473,300.00 for operations, $146,500.00 for performance funding, and $196,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (v) The appropriation for Oakland Community College is $25,163,800.00, $24,733,600.00 for operations, $396,400.00 for performance funding, and $33,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (w) The appropriation for Schoolcraft College is $14,993,000.00, $14,711,800.00 for operations, $260,200.00 for performance funding, and $21,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (x) The appropriation for Southwestern Michigan College is $7,816,100.00, $7,682,800.00 for operations, $103,800.00 for performance funding, and $29,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (y) The appropriation for St. Clair County Community College is $8,366,100.00, $8,210,400.00 for operations, $131,600.00 for performance funding, and $24,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (z) The appropriation for Washtenaw Community College is $16,281,900.00, $15,925,500.00 for operations, $331,800.00 for performance funding, and $24,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (aa) The appropriation for Wayne County Community College is $19,464,700.00, $19,193,300.00 for operations, $267,000.00 for performance funding, and $4,400.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (bb) The appropriation for West Shore Community College is $2,908,700.00, $2,851,200.00 for operations, $45,500.00 for performance funding, and $12,000.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (3) The amount appropriated in subsection (2) for community college operations is $363,363,500.00 $100.00 and is appropriated from the state school aid fund. (4) From the appropriations described in subsection (1), both of the following apply: (a) Subject to section 207a, the amount appropriated for fiscal year 2024-2025 to offset certain fiscal year 2024-2025 retirement contributions is $7,189,000.00, appropriated from the state school aid fund. (b) For fiscal year 2024-2025, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $21,800,000.00 for payments to participating community colleges, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A community college that receives money under this subdivision shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting the normal cost contribution rate. (5) From the appropriations described in subsection (1), subject to section 207b, the amount appropriated for payments to community colleges that are participating entities of the retirement system is $62,100,000.00, appropriated from the state school aid fund. (6) From the appropriations described in subsection (1), subject to section 207c, the amount appropriated for renaissance zone tax reimbursements is $2,200,000.00, appropriated from the state school aid fund. Each community college receiving funds in this subsection shall accrue these payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. (7) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, from the appropriations described in subsection (1), the amount appropriated for career and education navigators for adult learners is $1,150,000.00, appropriated from the state school aid fund. Community colleges, partnering with 1 or more county governments, where practicable, may apply for grant funding through the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to supplement or create navigation efforts of adult learners. The department shall issue a report including, but not limited to, the number of grants awarded, a list of community colleges awarded grants and the amounts, and the amount of unexpended funds remaining at the end of the fiscal year. The report must be issued to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on community colleges, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director by September 30, 2025. (8) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, from the appropriations described in subsection (1), $500,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money to the Michigan Community Colleges Association to support a program intended to encourage high school students and young adults to pursue public-service-focused careers, including those in public safety, education, and health care. (9) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, from the appropriations described in subsection (1), $350,000.00 is appropriated from the state school aid fund to Kalamazoo Valley Community College for internet accessibility improvements. Sec. 206. (1) Except for the funds appropriated in section 201(4)(b), the The funds appropriated in section 201 are appropriated for community colleges with fiscal years ending June 30, 2025 2026 and must be paid out of the state treasury and distributed by the state treasurer to the respective community colleges in 11 monthly installments on the sixteenth of each month, or the next succeeding business day, beginning with October 16, 2024. 2025. Each community college shall accrue its July and August 2025 2026 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.2026. (2) The funds appropriated in section 201(4)(b) are appropriated for community colleges with fiscal years ending June 30, 2025 and must be distributed to the respective community colleges in quarterly installments on the sixteenth of each November, February, May, and August. Each community college shall accrue its August 2025 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. Sec. 236. (1) Subject to the conditions set forth in this article, the amounts listed in this section are appropriated for higher education for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, 2026, from the funds indicated in this section. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this section: and sections 236d and 236j: (a) The gross appropriation is $2,324,292,600.00. $100.00 After deducting total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers in the amount of $0.00, the adjusted gross appropriation is $2,324,292,600.00.$100.00. (b) The sources of the adjusted gross appropriation described in subdivision (a) are as follows: (i) Total federal revenues, $3,200,000.00.$0.00. (ii) Total local revenues, $0.00. (iii) Total private revenues, $0.00. (iv) Total other state restricted revenues, $461,668,300.00.$50.00. (v) State general fund/general purpose money, $1,859,424,300.00.$50.00. (c) The totals and subtotals reflected in subdivisions (a) and (b) do not include amounts appropriated under subsection (7)(f) or (8)(b) to avoid duplicating totals of amounts appropriated in this section and section 236j. (2) Amounts appropriated for public universities are as follows: (a) The appropriation for Central Michigan University is $96,833,700.00, $93,819,600.00 for operations, $1,407,300.00 for operations increase, and $1,606,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (b) The appropriation for Eastern Michigan University is $84,381,000.00, $82,738,700.00 for operations, $1,241,100.00 for operations increase, and $401,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (c) The appropriation for Ferris State University is $60,548,400.00, $58,932,300.00 for operations, $884,000.00 for operations increase, and $732,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (d) The appropriation for Grand Valley State University is $98,876,100.00, $96,111,200.00 for operations, $1,441,700.00 for operations increase, and $1,323,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (e) The appropriation for Lake Superior State University is $15,838,800.00, $14,251,800.00 for operations, $213,800.00 for operations increase, and $1,373,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (f) The appropriation for Michigan State University is $396,479,600.00, $316,765,400.00 for operations, $4,751,500.00 for operations increase, $2,143,100.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver, $39,096,200.00 for MSU AgBioResearch, and $33,723,400.00 for MSU Extension. (g) The appropriation for Michigan Technological University is $55,245,300.00, $53,658,800.00 for operations, $804,900.00 for operations increase, and $781,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (h) The appropriation for Northern Michigan University is $54,263,000.00, $52,069,300.00 for operations, $781,000.00 for operations increase, and $1,412,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (i) The appropriation for Oakland University is $73,327,600.00, $71,957,000.00 for operations, $1,079,400.00 for operations increase, and $291,200.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (j) The appropriation for Saginaw Valley State University is $34,394,500.00, $33,690,600.00 for operations, $505,400.00 for operations increase, and $198,500.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (k) The appropriation for University of Michigan ? Ann Arbor is $362,128,600.00, $355,278,300.00 for operations, $5,329,000.00 for operations increase, and $1,521,300.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (l) The appropriation for University of Michigan ? Dearborn is $31,722,500.00, $31,048,000.00 for operations, $465,700.00 for operations increase, and $208,800.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (m) The appropriation for University of Michigan ? Flint is $26,695,600.00, $26,013,500.00 for operations, $390,200.00 for operations increase, and $291,900.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (n) The appropriation for Wayne State University is $227,735,900.00, $223,950,900.00 for operations, $3,359,300.00 for operations increase, and $425,700.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (o) The appropriation for Western Michigan University is $121,845,400.00, $119,440,200.00 for operations, $1,791,600.00 for operations increase, and $613,600.00 for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver. (3) The amount appropriated in subsection (2) for public universities is $1,740,316,000.00, appropriated from the following: (a) State school aid fund, $443,168,300.00. (b) State general fund/general purpose money, $1,297,147,700.00. (4) The amount appropriated for Michigan public school employees' retirement system reimbursement is $0.00. (5) The amount appropriated for state and regional programs is $316,800.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose money and allocated as follows: (a) Higher education database modernization and conversion, $200,000.00. (b) Midwestern Higher Education Compact, $116,800.00. (6) The amount appropriated for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez - Rosa Parks program is $2,691,500.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose money and allocated as follows: (a) Select student support services, $1,956,100.00. (b) Michigan college/university partnership program, $586,800.00. (c) Morris Hood, Jr. educator development program, $148,600.00. (7) Subject to subsection (8), the amount appropriated for grants and financial aid is $542,453,600.00, allocated as follows: (a) State competitive scholarships, $19,930,900.00. (b) Tuition grants, $41,522,700.00. (c) Tuition incentive program, $93,800,000.00. (d) Children of veterans and officer's survivor tuition grant programs, $2,000,000.00. (e) Project GEAR-UP, $3,200,000.00. (f) Michigan achievement scholarships, $330,000,000.00. From this amount, up to $10,000,000.00 may be used to award skills scholarships under section 248a. (g) Michigan reconnect, $52,000,000.00. (8) The money appropriated in subsection (7) for grants and financial aid is appropriated from the following: (a) Federal revenues under the United States Department of Education, Office of Elementary and Secondary Education, GEAR-UP program, $3,200,000.00. (b) Postsecondary scholarship fund, $330,000,000.00. (c) State general fund/general purpose money, $209,253,600.00. (d) At the close of the fiscal year, state general fund/general purpose money appropriated in subsection (7) for grants and scholarships that is unspent must be deposited into the postsecondary scholarship fund created in section 236j. (9) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, in addition to the allocation under subsection (4), from the appropriations described in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $8,500,000.00 for payments to participating public universities, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A public university that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting the normal cost contribution rate. As used in this subsection, "participating public universities" means public universities that are a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that pay contributions to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the state fiscal year. (10) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from the state general fund/general purpose money for Michigan Transfer Pathways. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall use funds appropriated under this subsection to work with the Michigan Transfer Network, community colleges, public universities, and other institutions of higher education in this state to facilitate the transfer of students and acceptance of credits among these institutions. The department may hire limited time FTEs or external consultants with the funds. The funds allocated under this subsection for fiscal year 2024-2025 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds remaining at the end of fiscal year 2024-2025 are carried forward into fiscal year 2025-2026, and any unexpended funds remaining at the end of fiscal year 2025-2026 are carried forward into fiscal year 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to support transfer pathways at postsecondary institutions in this state. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027. (11) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $980,000.00 is appropriated from the state general fund/general purpose money for the FAFSA completion incentive. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall use funds appropriated under this subsection to run a promotional activity to promote completing the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) for the first time consistent with the promotional-activity exception provided for in section 372(2) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.372. The promotional activity must offer prize funds that are available to a number, chosen by the department, of randomly selected Michigan residents who satisfactorily demonstrate to the department that they have completed the FAFSA for the first time. (12) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $750,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money to Western Michigan University to support the Project Clean program. (13) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $70,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money to a city with a population between 70,000 and 80,000 in a county with a population between 225,000 and 275,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census for investments to improve safety on the campus of a public university based in that city. (14) For fiscal year 2024-2025 only, subject to section 236r, from the appropriation described in subsection (1), $200,000.00 is appropriated from state general fund/general purpose money for an education performance study. (15) All of the following apply for fiscal year 2024-2025 only: (a) In addition to the allocations under subsections (4) and (9), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for payments to participating public universities, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A public university that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of payments toward the pension and other postemployment benefit unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities associated with members and pension recipients of those participating public universities. (b) The amount allocated in subdivision (a) must be allocated to each participating public university based on each participating public university's percentage of the total combined payrolls of the universities' employees who are members of the retirement system and who were hired before January 1, 1996 and the universities' employees who would have been members of the retirement system on or after January 1, 1996, but for the enactment of 1995 PA 272 for all public universities that are participating public universities for the immediately preceding state fiscal year. (c) Participating public universities receiving funds under this subsection shall forward an amount equal to the amount allocated under subdivision (a) to the retirement system in a form, manner, and time frame determined by the retirement system. (d) Amounts allocated in subdivision (a) must be paid to participating public universities in 1 lump-sum installment no later than October 31, 2024. (e) As used in this subsection, "participating public universities" means public universities that are reporting units of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that pay contributions to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the state fiscal year. Sec. 241. Subject to sections 241a, 241b, 241c, 241e, and 244, the funds appropriated in sections 236 and 236d to public universities must be paid out of the state treasury and distributed by the state treasurer to the respective institutions in 11 equal monthly installments on the sixteenth of each month, or the next succeeding business day, beginning with October 16, 2024. 2025. Except for Wayne State University, each institution shall accrue its July and August 2025 2026 payments to its institutional fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.2026.